Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
HOUSING

§209-16 Housing relief. (a) Whenever
the governor pursuant to section 209-2 declares a state disaster, the governor
may invoke this part. After the declaration by the governor and pursuant to
the governor's proclamation, the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation
shall construct, manage, and operate housing units on public lands which may be
set aside by the governor, using for the purpose the funds available or made
available to the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation.

(b) Housing so constructed shall be of
standard quality and shall conform substantially to the specifications used on
other projects controlled by the Hawaii public housing authority. [L 1961, c
189, §10; Supp, §98P-10; HRS §209-16; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 337, §9(1); am
L 1997, c 350, §§10, 14; am L 2005, c 196, §26; am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next